North Dakota, session 69, HB1569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Human trafficking awareness and prevention - Curriculum.
1. Beginning no later than the 2027 - 28 school year, a school district shall offer instruction
on human trafficking awareness and prevention to each student at least once before
the student completes grade twelve.
2. The superintendent of public instruction shall review and approve curriculum before
the curriculum is used by a school district, or provide a school district with approved
curriculum.
3. A school district may offer instruction under this section beginning in grade seven.
4. The curriculum may be integrated into a relevant course.
5. The curriculum must include:
a. Medically and legally accurate definitions of human trafficking and information
about the term stigmatization and how it may reduce reporting and increase the
difficulty of detecting and prosecuting human trafficking crimes ;
b. Information about reporting systems and community engagement opportunities
with local, state, or national organizations against human trafficking ;
c. Basic identification training to determine if an individual is at risk of or has been
human trafficked; and
Page No. 1 25.1312.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
d. Information to help students recognize the signs and behavior changes in others
that may indicate grooming for human trafficking or other unlawful, coercive
relationships.
6. A school district may receive funds or donations to implement this section, as long as
any curriculum provided to the school district satisfies subsection 2 .
Page No. 2 25.1312.02000